Maine, session 132, LD1559.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2423-G is enacted to read:
§2423-G. Medical cannabis farmers' markets
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary and in accordance with
the requirements of this section, the office may issue a license authorizing a person to hold
a medical cannabis farmers' market.
1. Definition. As used in this section, "medical cannabis farmers' market" or "farmers'
market" means a building, structure or place, used by one or more registered caregivers or
registered dispensaries and licensed by the office in accordance with this section, for the
direct sale of harvested cannabis and cannabis products to qualifying patients and for the
consumption of harvested cannabis and cannabis products purchased by qualifying patients
from the registered caregivers or registered dispensaries.
2. Licensing and operational requirements for medical cannabis farmers'
markets; rules. In accordance with rules adopted by the office pursuant to this subsection,
one or more registered caregivers or registered dispensaries may collectively apply to the
office for a license to hold a medical cannabis farmers' market. The office shall adopt by
rule criteria for issuance of a medical cannabis farmers' market license. The rules must
include, but are not limited to:
A. Provisions regarding the application process and application requirements for
issuance of a medical cannabis farmers' market license, including, but not limited to:
(1) Information regarding the proposed date or dates, times and location of the
farmers' market; and
(2) Demonstration by the applicant of the applicant's valid registry identification
card issued by the office, if the applicant is a registered caregiver, or the applicant's
valid registration certificate issued by the office, if the applicant is a registered
dispensary;
B. Provisions establishing criteria for issuance of a medical cannabis farmers' market
license, including, but not limited to:
(1) Demonstration of compliance with all other applicable provisions of this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter regarding the sale of harvested
cannabis and cannabis products to qualifying patients;
(2) Demonstration of security measures to be implemented at the farmers' market
sufficient to prevent unauthorized access by persons who are not registered
caregivers or registered dispensaries participating in the farmers' market or who
are not qualifying patients attending the farmers' market; and
(3) Demonstration of sufficient procedures for the verification of registry
identification cards of qualifying patients entering the farmers' market; and
C. Provisions establishing operational requirements for the conduct of a medical
cannabis farmers' market, including, but not limited to:
(1) Requirements for clear separation of the areas within the farmers' market
within which harvested cannabis and cannabis products may be sold to qualifying
patients from the areas within which the harvested cannabis and cannabis products
Page 1 - 132LR1296(01)

413 purchased may be consumed by qualifying patients, as well as additional
424 requirements regarding the clear separation of those areas from any other areas
435 within or adjacent to the farmers' market within which products that are not
446 harvested cannabis or cannabis products are sold by persons that are not registered
457 caregivers and registered dispensaries and purchased by persons who are not
468 qualifying patients;
(2) Requirements regarding the allowable consumption of harvested cannabis and
cannabis products purchased at the farmers' market by qualifying patients;
(3) Requirements regarding compliance with any applicable local ordinances or
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 3, including requirements that a medical
cannabis farmers' market receive municipal approval;
(4) Requirements regarding allowable sales of products that are not harvested
cannabis or cannabis products by persons that are not registered caregivers or
registered dispensaries within or adjacent to the farmers' market;
(5) Requirements regarding the collection of applicable sales taxes by registered
caregivers and registered dispensaries selling harvested cannabis and cannabis
products at the farmers' market and requirements regarding compliance with other
applicable record-keeping requirements directed by the office; and
(6) Provisions regarding fines, suspensions or other penalties that may be imposed
by the office as a result of a violation of the requirements of this section or the rules
adopted pursuant to this section and any necessary provisions for the
administration and enforcement by the office of this section and the adopted rules.
Rules adopted by the office pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
3. Local regulation of medical cannabis farmers' markets. Consistent with the
same requirements as under section 2429-D, a municipality may regulate or prohibit the
holding of medical cannabis farmers' markets within the municipality and may adopt or
amend an ordinance or approve a warrant article authorizing farmers' markets and establish
provisions regarding the issuance of municipal approval for a farmers' market.
Sec. 2. Office of Cannabis Policy rules. The Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, Office of Cannabis Policy shall initiate rulemaking in accordance with
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 2423-G, subsection 2 regarding the licensure,
operation and administration of medical cannabis farmers' markets and, not later than
January 9, 2026, provisionally adopt and submit those rules for legislative review in
accordance with Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.